Missouri, session 2026, SB916.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 537.600 and 537.610, RSMo, are
repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 537.600 and 537.610, to read as follows:
537.600. 1. Such sovereign or governmental tort
immunity as existed at common law in this state prior to
September 12, 1977, except to the extent waived, abrogated
or modified by statutes in effect prior to that date, shall
remain in full force and effect; except that, the immunity
of the public entity from liability and suit for
compensatory damages for negligent acts or omissions is
hereby expressly waived in the following instances:
(1) Injuries directly resulting from the negligent
acts or omissions by public employees, or an agent of the
Missouri department of transportation, arising out of the
operation of motor vehicles or motorized vehicles within the
course of their employment;
(2) Injuries caused by the condition of a public
entity's property if the plaintiff establishes that the

SS SCS SB 916 2
property was in dangerous condition at the time of the
injury, that the injury directly resulted from the dangerous
condition, that the dangerous condition created a reasonably
foreseeable risk of harm of the kind of injury which was
incurred, and that either a negligent or wrongful act or
omission of an employee of the public entity, or an agent of
the Missouri department of transportation, within the course
of his employment, created the dangerous condition or a
public entity, or an agent of the Missouri department of
transportation, had actual or constructive notice of the
dangerous condition in sufficient time prior to the injury
to have taken measures to protect against the dangerous
condition. In any action under this subdivision wherein a
plaintiff alleges that he was damaged by the negligent,
defective, or dangerous design of a highway or road, which
was designed and constructed prior to September 12, 1977,
the public entity shall be entitled to a defense which shall
be a complete bar to recovery whenever the public entity can
prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the alleged
negligent, defective, or dangerous design reasonably
complied with highway and road design standards generally
accepted at the time the road or highway was designed and
constructed.
2. The express waiver of sovereign immunity in the
instances specified in subdivisions (1) and (2) of
subsection 1 of this section are absolute waivers of
sovereign immunity in all cases within such situations
whether or not the public entity was functioning in a
governmental or proprietary capacity and whether or not the
public entity is covered by a liability insurance for tort.
3. A statutory cause of action for damages against an
agent of the Missouri department of transportation is hereby

SS SCS SB 916 3
created, replacing any such common law cause of action
against a private contractor, subcontractor, engineer, or
employee thereof for liability of claims arising from
design, condition, or maintenance of a Missouri department
of transportation project after execution of a contract to
perform work but prior to the commencement of construction
activities on the project site and for when construction
activities on the project site are approved and accepted by
the Missouri department of transportation. The Missouri
department of transportation shall be solely liable for
personal injury or death arising out of instances after
execution of a contract to perform work but prior to the
commencement of construction activities and after
construction activities on the project site are approved and
accepted by the Missouri department of transportation.
4. The immunity provided in subsection 3 of this
section shall not apply when any of the following conditions
exist:
(1) The work is so defective that it creates an
imminent danger to third parties;
(2) A defect in the work was concealed and not
discoverable by a reasonable inspection by the state
highways and transportation commission;
(3) The agent of the Missouri department of
transportation knew of the dangerous condition and did not
disclose it to the state highways and transportation
commission; or
(4) The plans or specifications followed were so
imperfect or improper that the agent of the Missouri
department of transportation should have known the work to
be done thereunder would result in an unsafe condition.

SS SCS SB 916 4
5. The Missouri standard specifications for highway
construction, or its successor, as published by the state
highway and transportation commission shall not include
provisions requiring a contractor to indemnify or defend the
state, the state highways and transportation commission,
employees of the Missouri department of transportation, or
an agent of the Missouri department of transportation prior
to the commencement of work under a contract. No contractor
shall be required to agree to an indemnification or a duty
to defend provision as a condition of any agreement to
perform work for the state highways and transportation
commission.
6. The term "public entity" as used in this section
shall include any multistate compact agency created by a
compact formed between this state and any other state which
has been approved by the Congress of the United States.
7. The term "agent of the Missouri department of
transportation" as used in this section shall mean any
private contractors, subcontractors, engineers or the
employees thereof performing work in accordance with the
plans and specifications approved by the Missouri department
100 of transportation.
101 8. The term "final inspection" as used in this section
102 shall mean the project engineer has made an inspection of
103 the project and determined that all construction
104 contemplated by the contract has been completed to the
105 engineer's satisfaction, and the engineer has notified the
106 contractor in writing of acceptance for maintenance as of
107 the date of that inspection, with the exception of items
108 covered by item specific performance bonds.
109 9. The phrase "after execution of a contract to
110 perform work but prior to the commencement of construction

SS SCS SB 916 5
111 activities" as used in this section shall apply as a period
112 of time when a contract is fully executed and signed by an
113 agent of the Missouri department of transportation and the
114 Missouri department of transportation but shall end when the
115 agent of the Missouri department of transportation first
116 begins performing work pursuant to the terms of the
117 contract, including the furnishing of labor, material,
118 equipment, and other incidentals necessary or convenient to
119 the successful completion of the project and the carrying
120 out of duties and obligations imposed by the contract.
121 10. The phrase "construction activities on the project
122 site are approved and accepted by the Missouri department of
123 transportation" as used in this section shall apply as a
124 fixed date in time when all corrections are completed by an
125 agent of the Missouri department of transportation and a
126 final inspection has been conducted by the engineer for the
127 Missouri department of transportation. Approval and
128 acceptance of the construction activities on the project
129 site shall be deemed approved and accepted for partial or
130 full acceptance of the work on a project site upon the
131 expiration of twenty business days after conducting the
132 final inspection by the Missouri department of
133 transportation.
537.610. 1. The commissioner of administration,
through the purchasing division, and the governing body of
each political subdivision of this state, notwithstanding
any other provision of law, may purchase liability insurance
for tort claims, made against the state or the political
subdivision, but the maximum amount of such coverage shall
not exceed two million dollars for all claims arising out of
a single occurrence and shall not exceed three hundred
thousand dollars for any one person in a single accident or

SS SCS SB 916 6
occurrence, except for those claims governed by the
provisions of the Missouri workers' compensation law,
chapter 287, and no amount in excess of the above limits
shall be awarded or settled upon. Sovereign immunity for
the state of Missouri and its political subdivisions is
waived only to the maximum amount of and only for the
purposes covered by such policy of insurance purchased
pursuant to the provisions of this section and in such
amount and for such purposes provided in any self-insurance
plan duly adopted by the governing body of any political
subdivision of the state. For purposes of this section as
it relates to political subdivisions, the term "purchase"
refers only to the direct acquisition by a governing body of
a political subdivision of this state of insurance coverage
from an insurance company or other business entity and does
not include any indirect action by contract or otherwise
including, but not limited to, requiring additional insured
coverage or insured status under the insurance policy of
another person or entity.
2. The liability of the state and its public entities
on claims within the scope of sections 537.600 to 537.650,
shall not exceed two million dollars for all claims arising
out of a single accident or occurrence and shall not exceed
three hundred thousand dollars for any one person in a
single accident or occurrence, except for those claims
governed by the provisions of the Missouri workers'
compensation law, chapter 287.
3. No award for damages on any claim against a public
entity within the scope of sections 537.600 to 537.650,
shall include punitive or exemplary damages.
4. If the amount awarded to or settled upon multiple
claimants exceeds two million dollars, any party may apply

SS SCS SB 916 7
to any circuit court to apportion to each claimant his
proper share of the total amount limited by subsection 1 of
this section. The share apportioned each claimant shall be
in the proportion that the ratio of the award or settlement
made to him bears to the aggregate awards and settlements
for all claims arising out of the accident or occurrence,
but the share shall not exceed three hundred thousand
dollars.
5. The limitation on awards for liability provided for
in this section shall be increased or decreased on an annual
basis effective January first of each year in accordance
with the Implicit Price Deflator for Personal Consumption
Expenditures as published by the Bureau of Economic Analysis
of the United States Department of Commerce. The current
value of the limitation shall be calculated by the director
of the department of commerce and insurance, who shall
furnish that value to the secretary of state, who shall
publish such value in the Missouri Register as soon after
each January first as practicable, but it shall otherwise be
exempt from the provisions of section 536.021.
6. Any claim filed against any public entity under
this section shall be subject to the penalties provided by
supreme court rule 55.03, or any successor rule.
✓